Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2649
Violations; hearing; order.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of the Pesticide Act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any order of the department, the director may issue a notice of hearing as provided for in section 2-2649.02 requiring the person to appear before the director (1) to show cause why an order should not be entered requiring such person to cease and desist from the violation charged. If after a hearing the director finds such person to be in violation of the act or the rules and regulations, he or she shall enter an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the specific act, practice, or omission, (2) to determine whether an administrative fine should be imposed or levied against the person pursuant to subdivision (9) of section 2-2626, or (3) to determine whether the license of such person should be denied. Proceedings initiated pursuant to this section shall not preclude the department from pursuing other administrative, civil, or criminal actions.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 25;

Laws 2006, LB 874, § 13.